California, session 20252026, SB987.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 14199.200) is added to Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 7.8. California Health Access Fund14199.200. (a) The California Health Access Fund is hereby created within the State Treasury. The State Department of Health Care Services shall administer the fund for the purpose described in subdivision (c).(b) Moneys in the fund shall include deposits, through any applicable transfers made by the Legislature, equal to the amount of any savings to the state resulting from decreased enrollment in the Medi-Cal program caused by enrollment barriers created by H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), including, but not limited to, the imposition of work or community engagement requirements and more frequent redeterminations for certain Medi-Cal populations.(c) Upon appropriation made by the Legislature for this purpose, moneys in the fund shall be used to ensure that California residents losing health care coverage due to the impacts of H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), as described in subdivision (b), or due to any other divestments from the health care system, can continue to receive health care services and that health care providers are reimbursed for these services.